Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-136
Adjutant General; National Guard; officers; qualifications; service; discharge.

(1) The Adjutant General may hold such position until the age of sixty-six years.

(2) Staff officers, including officers of the pay, inspection, subsistence, medical, and Adjutant General's department, shall have had previous military experience and shall hold their positions until they have reached the age of sixty-four years unless retired prior to that time by reason of resignation, disability, or pursuant to applicable regulations issued by the Department of the Army or the Department of the Air Force. Vacancies among such officers shall be filled by appointment by the Governor or the Adjutant General.

(3) All commissioned officers shall be entitled to an honorable discharge in writing at the expiration of their term of office on properly accounting for all property for which they are responsible.

Laws 1917, c. 205, § 16, p. 488;

Laws 1919, c. 121, § 4, p. 291;

Laws 1921, c. 234, § 2, p. 835;

C.S.1922, § 3320;

C.S.1929, § 55-140;

Laws 1935, c. 121, § 3, p. 440;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-140;

Laws 1943, c. 127, § 1, p. 430;

R.S.1943, § 55-115;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 34, p. 1593;

Laws 1978, LB 570, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 170, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB848, § 2.